Utah statutes.
16-10a-903.   Mandatory indemnification of directors.

Unless limited by its articles of incorporation, a corporation shall indemnify a director who was successful, on the merits or otherwise, in the defense of any proceeding, or in the defense of any claim, issue, or matter in the proceeding, to which he was a party because he is or was a director of the corporation, against reasonable expenses incurred by him in connection with the proceeding or claim with respect to which he has been successful.



Enacted by Chapter 277, 1992 General Session

